Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 13. Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System

§ 25-13-1.
Purpose of system.

There is hereby established a retirement system for the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, as defined in this chapter, effective July 1, 1958, under which members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol may retire for superannuation or may retire for reason of disability, and providing benefits to widows and orphans of such patrolmen. This retirement system is designed to supplement and is in addition to the provisions of Sections 25-11-1 through 25-11-21. Under the terms of this chapter, the highway safety patrolmen, as defined herein, retain all the benefits of old age and survivors insurance under the federal laws administered by the department of public health, education and welfare, or its successor, as provided in the federal and state agreement executed on July 2, 1952, but shall not be eligible for benefits under Sections 25-11-101 through 25-11-139, which is the state retirement annuity plan for state employees. This chapter is a substitute for and in lieu of said sections, and is designed to provide more liberal benefits for the highway safety patrolmen by reason of the dangerous nature of their employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-51; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 1.

§ 25-13-3.
Eligibility for service retirement benefits.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term “Highway Patrol or Highway Safety Patrol” for the purpose of establishing membership in this system for persons presently employed by the Highway Safety Patrol shall mean and include all the officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol who have completed a course of instruction in an authorized highway patrol training school on general law enforcement, and who have served for a period of at least five (5) years prior to July 1, 1958, as a uniformed officer of the Highway Safety Patrol in the enforcement of the traffic laws of the State of Mississippi, or in the driver’s license division, or who are now engaged in such service. New members shall include all the officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol who have completed a course of instruction in an authorized highway patrol training school on general law enforcement, and who serve as sworn officers of the Highway Patrol in the enforcement of the laws of the State of Mississippi.

Any former sworn officer of the Highway Safety Patrol who returns to service with the Highway Safety Patrol in any capacity, and who has had not less than two (2) years of prior service as a sworn officer of the Highway Safety Patrol, and who was disabled by wounds or accident in line of duty, may become a member of the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System even though his present duties would not otherwise qualify him for membership, and he may continue membership so long as he remains in the employ of the Highway Safety Patrol.

Membership in the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System shall be retroactive to the date of such patrolman’s return to employment with the Highway Safety Patrol, and any funds contributed by him, previous to July 1, 1958, to the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be transferred to his credit in the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, and the employer’s contributions made to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the patrolman shall also be transferred to the employer’s credit in the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System; and the difference between the contributions for both the employer and the employee made to the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and those which should have been made to the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System by both employer and employee for the patrolman since the date of his return to the Highway Safety Patrol shall be paid into the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System.

In order to be eligible for service retirement benefits under this retirement system any member must have served at least five (5) years as a sworn officer of the Highway Patrol engaged in the enforcement of the laws of the State of Mississippi, or at least five (5) years as a sworn agent of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, or a combination of at least five (5) years as a sworn agent of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics and as a sworn officer of the Highway Patrol. If the officer is transferred from duty making him eligible for membership in this retirement system to other duties for which credit is not allowed by this system, and he has not been credited with a minimum of five (5) years in this system as a sworn officer of the Highway Patrol engaged in the enforcement of the laws of this state, then an amount as determined by the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be transferred from this system to his account in the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to make him a member of that system with full credit for his years of service with the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, and he shall become a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi with prior service credits. The amount that is determined to be necessary to be transferred shall be paid first from the member’s total contributions in the Highway Safety Patrol System, plus interest, so that all of those funds are transferred, and any remainder shall be paid from the employer’s accumulation account.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-52; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 25-13-5.
Creditable service.

Creditable service on which a member’s service or disability retirement benefit is based shall consist of “prior service” and membership service. Prior service shall mean service performed for the Highway Safety Patrol as defined in Section 25-13-3 before July 1, 1958 and service performed as a sworn agent for the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics prior to March 29, 1991. No prior service credits shall be granted any person who re-enters the employment of the Highway Safety Patrol after July 1, 1958, except that any former sworn officer of the Highway Safety Patrol who returns to the Highway Safety Patrol in any capacity, and who has had not less than two (2) years of prior service as a sworn officer of the Highway Safety Patrol, and who was disabled by wounds or accident in line of duty, may become a member of the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System with full credit for any previous service as set forth in Section 25-13-3 with the Highway Safety Patrol. Membership service shall mean all services for which credit may be allowed under this chapter subsequent to July 1, 1958, and all lawfully credited unused leave as of the date of withdrawal from service, as certified by the appointing authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-53; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 581, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1991).

§ 25-13-7.
Custodian of fund; financing; payment of benefits; maintenance as separate fund.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, as created by Sections 25-11-1 through 25-11-139, shall act as custodian of this Disability and Relief Fund for members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; shall receive to the credit of such fund all appropriations and other funds available as an employer’s contribution thereto from any source whatsoever; and the Highway Safety Patrol shall each month deduct from the salary of each member, as defined in Section 25-13-3, five percent (5%) thereof, and shall pay the amount so deducted to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System to be credited to the Disability and Relief Fund for the members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol. Provided, however, that the said board of trustees may, biennially, following March 18, 1977, vary the percentage of employee contribution on the basis of the liabilities of the retirement system for the various allowances and benefits as shown by actuarial valuation. From the funds credited to this account, the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall pay retirements, disability benefits, survivors benefits, expenses and shall refund contributions as provided in this chapter. The said “Disability and Relief Fund for the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol” shall be maintained as a separate fund, separate from all other funds held by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi and shall be used only for the payment of benefits provided for by this chapter, or amendments thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-54; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 4; Laws, 1977, ch. 373; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 25-13-8.
Employer to pay member contributions required for fund; tax treatment; methods of payment.

The employer shall pick up the member contributions required by Section 25-13-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, for all compensation earned after June 30, 1982, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and Mississippi Income Tax Code; however, the employer shall continue to withhold federal and state income taxes based upon these contributions until the internal revenue service or federal courts rule that pursuant to section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the member until such time as they are distributed or made available. The employer shall pay these member contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to the member. The employer may pick up these contributions by a reduction in the cash salary of the member or by an offset against a future salary increase or by a combination of a reduction in salary and offset against a future salary increase. If member contributions are picked up they shall be treated for all purposes of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System in the same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made prior to the date picked up.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 381, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 25-13-9.
Disability retirement.

Upon application of a member or his employer, but in no event before termination of state service, any member who has not attained the age of fifty-five (55) years may be retired by the administrative board created by this chapter, not less than thirty (30) and not more than ninety (90) days next following the date of filing the application, on a disability retirement allowance, provided that the Medical Board of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi, after an evaluation of medical evidence, which may include a physical examination by the medical board, certifies that he is mentally or physically incapacitated for the performance of duty, that the incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that the sickness or injury was caused or sustained as a direct result of duty in the Highway Safety Patrol after July 1, 1958.

Any former uniformed highway safety patrolman who has had not less than two (2) years of prior service with the Highway Safety Patrol and who was disabled by wounds or accident in line of duty, and who has returned to duty with the Highway Safety Patrol, and who becomes a member of the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System with prior years’ service credits as provided in this chapter, may, if his disability from his previous wounds or accident received in line of duty returns and he again becomes totally and permanently disabled, receive full benefits as a disability retirant for service-connected disability.

Upon the application of a member or his employer, any member who is not yet eligible for service retirement benefits and who has had at least five (5) years of creditable service may be retired by the administrative board, not less than thirty (30) and not more than ninety (90) days next following the date of filing the application, on disability retirement allowance, provided that the Medical Board of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi, after an evaluation of medical evidence, which may include a physical examination by the medical board, certifies that he is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that the incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that he should be retired. This disability need not be service-connected.

Upon retirement for disability, a member shall receive a disability benefit equal to fifty percent (50%) of his average salary for the two (2) years immediately preceding his retirement, but not less than any retirement benefits for which he may be eligible at the date he is granted disability.

Once each year during the first five (5) years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every period of three (3) years thereafter, the administrative board may, and upon his application shall, require any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained the age of fifty-five (55) years to undergo a medical examination, the examination to be made at the place of residence of the beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon, by the Medical Board of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. If any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained the age of fifty-five (55) years refuses to submit to any medical examination provided for in this subsection, his allowance may be discontinued until his withdrawal of that refusal, and if his refusal continues for one (1) year, all his rights in that part of the disability benefit provided by employer contributions shall be revoked by the administrative board.

If the medical board reports and certifies to the administrative board that the disability beneficiary is engaged in, or is able to engage in, a gainful occupation paying more than the difference between his disability benefit and the average compensation, and if the administrative board concurs in that report, the disability benefit shall be reduced to an amount that, together with the amount earnable by him, equals the amount of his average compensation. If his earning capacity is later changed, the amount of the benefit may be further modified; however, the revised benefit shall not exceed the amount originally granted or an amount that, when added to the amount earnable by the beneficiary, equals the amount of his average compensation.

If a disability beneficiary under the age of fifty-five (55) years is restored to active service at a compensation not less than his average compensation, his disability benefit shall cease; he shall again become a member of the retirement system, and he shall contribute thereafter at the same rate he paid before disability. Any such prior service certificate on the basis of which his service was computed at the time of retirement shall be restored to full force and effect. In addition, upon his subsequent retirement he shall be credited with all creditable service as a member, including the period for which he was paid disability benefits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-55; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 581, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 620, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 22, 2002).

§ 25-13-11.
Retirement allowance; superannuation retirement; annual increase; minimum retirement allowances; waiver of benefits.

Any member upon withdrawal from service, upon or after attainment of the age of fifty-five (55) years, who has completed at least five (5) years of creditable service, or any member upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of forty-five (45) years, who has completed at least twenty (20) years of creditable service, or any member upon withdrawal from service, regardless of age, who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall be payable the first of the month following receipt of the member’s application in the Office of the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, but in no event before withdrawal from service.

Any member whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of fifty-five (55) years, who has completed more than five (5) years of creditable service and has not received a refund of the member’s accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance beginning upon his attaining the age of fifty-five (55) years of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service.

The annual amount of the retirement allowance shall consist of:

A member’s annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement, computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system.

An employer’s annuity which, together with the member’s annuity provided above, shall be equal to two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the average compensation, based on the four (4) highest consecutive years, for each year of membership service.

A prior service annuity equal to two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the average compensation, based on the four (4) highest consecutive years, for each year of prior service for which the member is allowed credit.

In the case of retirement of any member prior to attaining the age of fifty-five (55) years, the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the formula hereinabove set forth in this section, except that the employer’s annuity and prior service annuity above described shall be reduced by an actuarially determined percentage factor for each year of age below fifty-five (55) years, or for each year of service below twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, whichever is lesser.

Upon retiring from service, a member shall be eligible to obtain retirement benefits, as computed above, for life, except that the aggregate amount of the employer’s annuity and prior service annuity above described shall not exceed more than one hundred percent (100%) of the average compensation regardless of the years of service.

Any member in the service who has attained the age of sixty-three (63) years shall be retired immediately. However, any member who has attained age sixty-three (63) may ask the Commissioner of Public Safety to allow him to continue in service with the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol beyond age sixty-three (63). If the commissioner determines that the member’s continuance in service would be advantageous to the Highway Safety Patrol because of his expert knowledge, experience or qualifications, the member shall be allowed to continue in service beyond age sixty-three (63) for a period of one (1) year. After the initial one-year continuance, the commissioner may authorize the member to continue in service for another period of one (1) year until the member attains age sixty-five (65), at which time retirement shall be mandatory.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter pertaining to the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, no payments may be made for a retirement allowance on a monthly basis for a period of time in excess of that allowed by any applicable federal law.

In no case shall any retired member who has completed at least fifteen (15) years of creditable service receive less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month; in no case shall any retired member who has completed ten (10) or more years of creditable service, but less than fifteen (15) years of creditable service, receive less than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month; and in no case shall any retired member who has completed less than ten (10) years of creditable service receive less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per month. In no case shall a beneficiary who is receiving a retirement allowance receive less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per month or Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) per year.

Any retired member who is receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1999, shall receive an ad hoc increase in the annual retirement allowance equal to Three Dollars and Fifty Cents ($3.50) per month for each full fiscal year through June 30, 1999, that the member has actually drawn retirement payments from the date of retirement, or the date of last retirement if there is more than one (1) retirement date, plus an amount equal to One Dollar ($1.00) per month for each full year of creditable service and proportionately for each quarter year of creditable service, as documented by the system and on which benefits are being paid. If there are multiple beneficiaries receiving a retirement allowance from a deceased member’s account, the ad hoc increase shall be divided proportionately.

A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the plan to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled. The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System and the Public Employees’ Retirement System from any claim to the waived retirement benefits.

Any waiver under this subsection shall apply only to the person executing the waiver. A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement; however, a beneficiary may execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection.

The Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System shall retain all amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under this subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-56; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 6; Laws, 1966, ch. 620, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 10; Laws, 1999, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 9; Laws, 2011, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-13-11.1.
Payment of retirement benefits by the most appropriate means as determined by the board.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall make payments of retirement benefits under this chapter to members and to the beneficiaries of those members, by whatever means the board prescribes by regulation to be the most appropriate for the proper and efficient payment of benefits, including, but not limited to, direct deposit to an account with a financial institution that is a participant of the Automated Clearing House designated by the member or beneficiary. The board may provide for alternative means of payment if the member or beneficiary can demonstrate that payment by the prescribed means will cause the member or beneficiary undue hardship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-13-12.
Additional benefit payments.

Any member who is receiving a retirement allowance for service or disability retirement, or any beneficiary thereof, who has received a monthly benefit for at least one (1) full fiscal year, shall be eligible to receive an additional benefit, on December 1 or July 1 of the year as provided in subsection (6) or (7) of this section, equal to the sum of:

An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60) or the age established in the latest phase that has been implemented under subsection (3) of this section, plus

An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60) or the age established in the latest phase that has been implemented under subsection (3) of this section, multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance.

The calculation of the beneficiary’s additional benefit provided in this section shall be based on the member’s age and full fiscal years in retirement as if the member had lived.

From and after July 1, 2003, the board shall begin implementing a reduction in the age at which compounding of the portion of the additional benefit provided in subsection (1) (b) of this section will begin, which changes shall be implemented in phases as set forth in the table in this subsection. The board shall implement the phases systematically upon July 1 after the board’s actuary certifies that implementation of a phase will not cause the unfunded accrued actuarial liability amortization period for the retirement system to exceed twenty (20) years. The board shall have the exclusive authority to set the assumptions that are used in the actuarial valuation in accordance with Section 25-13-29.

Click to view

If a retiree who is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon the retiree’s death is receiving the additional benefit in one (1) payment and dies on or after July 1 but before December 1, the beneficiary designated on the retirement application, if any, shall receive in a single payment a fractional part of the additional benefit based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year. If there is no surviving beneficiary, payment shall be made in accordance with Section 25-13-21.1(1). Likewise, if a retiree is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon the retiree’s death in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments, any remaining payments of the additional benefit will be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated on the application, or if none, in accordance with Section 25-13-21.1(1). Any similar remaining payments of the additional benefit payable under this section to a deceased beneficiary who was receiving a monthly benefit shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-13-21.1(2). If the additional benefit is being received in one (1) payment each year, the additional benefit shall be prorated based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year when (i) the monthly benefit payable to a beneficiary terminates due to the expiration of an option, remarriage or cessation of dependent status or due to the retiree’s return to covered employment, and (ii) the monthly benefit terminates on or after July 1 and before December 1.

Each retired member or beneficiary thereof who receives an annual retirement allowance based on the average compensation for a period of five (5) successive or joined years and who receives a retirement allowance for the month of June 1986, shall receive an ad hoc increase of three percent (3%) in such retirement allowance effective July 1, 1986.

The additional benefit provided in this section shall be paid in one (1) payment in December of each year to those persons who are receiving a retirement allowance on December 1 of that year, unless an election is made under subsection (7) of this section. The board, in its discretion, may allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional benefit in one (1) payment each year to have the additional benefit paid in monthly installments if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional benefit in one (1) payment each year will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary.

Retired members or beneficiaries thereof who are receiving a retirement allowance may elect by an irrevocable agreement in writing filed in the Office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System no less than thirty (30) days before July 1 of any year, to begin receiving the additional benefit provided in this section in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning on July 1 of the year. This irrevocable agreement shall be binding on the member and subsequent beneficiaries. Payment of those monthly installments shall not extend beyond the month in which a retirement allowance is due and payable. Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who previously elected to receive the additional annual payment in monthly installments may elect, upon application on a form prescribed by the board, to have that payment made in one (1) payment in December of each year. This written election must be filed in the office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System before June 1, 2003, and shall be effective for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003. The board, in its discretion, may allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional benefit in monthly installments to have the additional benefit paid in one (1) payment in December of each year if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional benefit in monthly installments will cause financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary.

The additional benefit or benefits provided in this section are for the fiscal year in which they are paid.

The amount of the additional benefit provided in subsection (1) (b) of this section is calculated using the following formula:

[(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance],

where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60) or the age established in the latest phase that has been implemented under subsection (3) of this section.

In the event of death of a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments under an election made before July 1, 2002, and who would otherwise be eligible to receive the additional benefit provided in this section in one (1) payment in December of the current fiscal year, any remaining amounts shall be paid in a lump sum to the designated beneficiary.

When a member retires after July 1 and has previously received a retirement allowance for one or more full fiscal years, the retired member shall be eligible immediately for the additional benefit. The additional benefit shall be based on the current retirement allowance and the number of full fiscal years in retirement and shall be prorated and paid in monthly installments based on the number of months a retirement allowance is paid during the fiscal year.

IMPLEMENTATION TABLE FOR AGE OF COMPOUNDING THE ADDITIONAL BENEFIT AGE AT WHICH COMPOUNDING THE ADDITIONAL PHASE BENEFIT BEGINS Phase 1 Age 59 Phase 2 Age 58 Phase 3 Age 57 Phase 4 Age 56 Phase 5 Age 55

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 338; Laws, 1985, ch. 410; Laws, 1986, ch. 396, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 11; Laws, 1997, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 16; Laws, 2002, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 2004).

§ 25-13-13.
Death benefits.

Upon the death of any highway patrolman who has retired for service or disability and who has not elected any other option under Section 25-13-16, his or her spouse shall receive one-half (1/2) the benefit that he or she was receiving and each child not having attained his nineteenth birthday shall receive one-fourth (1/4) of the benefit, but not more than one-half (1/2) of the benefits shall be paid for the support and maintenance of two (2) or more children. Upon each child’s attaining the age of nineteen (19) years, the child shall no longer be eligible for the benefit, and when all of the children have attained their nineteenth birthday, only the spouse shall be eligible for one-half (1/2) the amount of the benefit. The spouse shall continue to be eligible for the benefit in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of his or her retirement benefit so long as the spouse may live. Surviving spouses of deceased members who previously received spouse retirement benefits under this subsection from and after July 1, 1958, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate the benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004.

Upon the death of any highway patrolman who has served the minimum retirement period required for eligibility for this retirement program, his or her spouse and family shall receive all the benefits payable to the highway patrolman’s beneficiaries as if he or she had retired at the time of his or her death. Those benefits continue to be paid to the spouse for life. The benefits are payable on a monthly basis. Surviving spouses of deceased members who previously received spouse retirement benefits under this subsection from and after July 1, 1958, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate the benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004.

The spouse and/or the dependent children of an active member who is killed in the line of performance of duty or dies as a direct result of an accident occurring in the line of performance of duty shall qualify, on approval of the board, for a retirement allowance on the first of the month following the date of death, but not before receipt of application by the board. The spouse shall receive a retirement allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the average compensation of the deceased highway patrolman. In addition to the retirement allowance for the spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, a retirement allowance shall be paid in the amount of one-fourth (1/4) of the average compensation for the support and maintenance of one (1) child or in the amount of one-half (1/2) of the average compensation for the support and maintenance of two (2) or more children. Those benefits shall cease to be paid for the support and maintenance of each child upon the child attaining the age of nineteen (19) years; however, the spouse shall continue to be eligible for the aforesaid retirement allowance. Benefits may be paid to a surviving parent or lawful custodian of the children for the use and benefit of the children without the necessity of appointment as guardian. The retirement allowance shall continue to be paid to the spouse for life. Surviving spouses of deceased members who previously received spouse retirement benefits under this subsection from and after July 1, 1958, and whose benefits were terminated before July 1, 2004, because of remarriage, may again receive the retirement benefits authorized under this subsection by making application with the board to reinstate the benefits. Any reinstatement of the benefits shall be prospective only and shall begin after the first of the month following the date of the application for reinstatement, but no earlier than July 1, 2004.

All benefits accruing to any child under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the parent custodian of the children or the legal guardian.

Children receiving the benefits provided in this section who are permanently or totally disabled shall continue to receive the benefits for as long as the medical board or other designated governmental agency certifies that the disability continues. The age limitation for benefits payable to a child under any provision of this section shall be extended beyond age nineteen (19), but in no event beyond the attainment of age twenty-three (23), as long as the child is a student regularly pursuing a full-time course of resident study or training in an accredited high school, trade school, technical or vocational institute, junior or community college, college, university or comparable recognized educational institution duly licensed by a state. A student child who is receiving a retirement allowance as of June 30, 2016, whose birthday falls during the school year (September 1 through June 30) is considered not to reach age twenty-three (23) until the July 1 following the actual twenty-third birthday. A full-time course of resident study or training means a day or evening noncorrespondence course that includes school attendance at the rate of at least thirty-six (36) weeks per academic year or other applicable period with a subject load sufficient, if successfully completed, to attain the educational or training objective within the period generally accepted as minimum for completion, by a full-time day student, of the academic or training program concerned.

If all the annuities provided for in this section payable on the account of the death of a member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions standing to the member’s credit in the annuity savings account at the time of the member’s death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to the person as the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees in the office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. If there is no designated beneficiary surviving at termination of benefits, the difference shall be payable pursuant to Section 25-13-21.1(1).

All benefits paid to a spouse or child due to the death of a member before or after retirement shall be paid in accordance with the statutory provisions set forth as of the date of death.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-57; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 7; Laws, 1966, ch. 620, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 500, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 422; Laws, 1986, ch. 396, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 472, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 11; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 9; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 17; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 9; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-13-14.
One-time early retirement for members with twenty years of service.

There is hereby created a one-time early retirement for any member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System who has at least twenty (20) years’ of service. A superannuation retirement taken under the provisions of this section shall not be subject to the three percent (3%) penalty for a member who is below the age of fifty-five (55) years as provided in Section 25-13-11(d), Mississippi Code of 1972. A retirement under the provisions of this section shall be based upon the current fiscal year’s salary of the applicant.

No member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System may avail himself of the benefits provided in this section from and after June 30, 1986.

This section shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 1986; however, future funding for those members who retire under the provisions of this section shall be provided from surplus funds of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System as deposited therein pursuant to the provisions of Section 63-1-46, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1986).